Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41B.039, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report to legislature. new text end new text begin No later than December 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the authority must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the senate and house of representatives with jurisdiction over agriculture on the beginning farmer loans under this section. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) background information on beginning farmers in Minnesota and any other information that the authority finds relevant to evaluating the effect of the loans on increasing opportunities for and the number of beginning farmers; new text end new text begin (2) the number and amount of loans; new text end new text begin (3) the geographic distribution of loans by county; new text end new text begin (4) the number of borrowers who are emerging farmers, as defined by section 17.055, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (5) the number of borrowers who were experiencing limited land access or limited market access when the loan was issued; new text end new text begin (6) disaggregated data regarding the gender, race, and ethnicity of borrowers; and new text end new text begin (7) the number and amount of loan applications in which the authority did not participate. new text end